src/fst/morphology/compounding.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no






! Prefixing and compounding
! =========================

LEXICON R
 RTags1 ;

!LEXICON RHyph
!+Cmp/Hyph:-   RTags1 ;

LEXICON RTags1
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RTags ; ! Flags to control compounding

! This is for regular compounding. All entries NOT requiring a hyphen should point to this:
LEXICON RTags
                     +Use/Circ+Cmp#:#                 Noun      ; ! This is the normal case.           
!      @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@#  Verb      ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound   
!     @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@#  Adjective ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation  
                +Cmp/Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:%-                Noun      ; ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so     
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%- Verb      ; ! Sem-julggaštus and maana-gåetie       
!@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%- Adjective ; ! are allowed.                 

! +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Acronym    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar" ! No acronyms for sje yet.
! +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Numeral    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
! +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for non-hyph.
                                    ! words. viessu-London goes through here.
           +Cmp/SplitR:%-  ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller



! This is for compounding with hyphen. All entries REQUIRING a hyphen should point to this:
!!xx comment out when put back to use
!xxLEXICON RHyphTags ! Recursive lexicon from all classes REQUIRING a hyphen to follow.
                  ! NBNBNB!!! The hyphen should be added here! NOT in the other lexicons!

!xx                +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-#                Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
!xx @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
!@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation
!               +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-#                Acronym    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
!               +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-#                ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns following hyph-words.
                                                                 ! London-Hull is covered here, whereas
                                                                 ! Hull-viessu
                                                                 ! is covered by RHyph + Noun.

                         +Cmp/SplitR:%- ENDLEX                     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept
                                                                 ! - want this in speller

! Proper noun compounds without hyphens are NOT presently covered - if they were
! to be added, they need to be marked +Err/Orth. Examples: LondonHull & viessuLondon.
